District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “DC Water and Sewer Authority Billing and Disconnection Clarification
Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 2(3)(B) of the Language Access Act of 2004, effective June 19, 2004
(D.C. Law 15-167; D.C. Official Code § 2-1931(3)(B)), is amended by adding a new sub-
subparagraph (vii-I) to read as follows:
“(vii-I) The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority;”.
Sec. 3. Section 216(d) of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department
of Public Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C.
Official Code § 34-2202.16(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The Authority may impose additional charges and penalties for late payment of bills
not exceeding a charge of 10% for any charges or bills remaining unpaid for more than 30 days,
and a penalty at the rate of 1% per month compounded monthly for any charges or bills that
remain unpaid for more than 60 days”.”
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Section 103 of the District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, approved May
18, 1954 (68 Stat. 102; D.C. Official Code § 34-2407.01), is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 103. Discontinuance of water service for failure to pay water charges.
“(a)(1) The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“Authority”), established
pursuant to section 202(a) of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department of
Public Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C.
Official Code § 34-2202.02(a)), may provide for the collection of water charges, in advance or
otherwise, from the owner or occupant of any building, property, or other location furnished
water or water service by the District.
“(2) The Authority may shut off the water supply to any such building,
property, or other location upon failure of the owner or occupant thereof to pay such water
charges within 30 days from the date of rendition of the bill therefor, regardless of any change in
ownership or occupancy of such building, property, or other location.
“(b)(1) If the Authority has shut off the water supply to any property for failure to pay
District water and sanitary sewer service charges, it shall be unlawful for any person to restore
the water supply without the express authorization of the Authority.
“(2) The Authority shall impose a fine in an amount not less than 20% of the
delinquent charges or more than $100, whichever is greater, upon the owner or occupant of the
property, unless the Authority determines that the owner or occupant did not restore or solicit a
person to restore the water.
“(c) The Authority shall submit on the 7th day of each month, the following information
to the Council, the Office of the Attorney General, the Office of the People’s Counsel, and the
Office of the Tenant Advocate for the preceding month:
“(1) The number of properties that received a notice of disconnection;
“(2) Of those properties that were issued a notice, the number of properties that
experienced a disconnection;
“(3) Of those properties that experienced a disconnection, the number of
properties that had service restored;
“(4) The number of properties that entered into a payment plan;
“(5) The number of properties that have had bill payment assumed by the tenants
through a tenant association; and
“(6) The number of properties that have been placed in receivership.”.
Sec. 5. Section 431 of Title 21 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (21
DCMR § 431), is amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “TO TENANTS” and inserting
the phrase “TO OCCUPANTS” in its place.
(b) Subsection 431.1 is amended to read as follows:
“431.1 At least thirty (30) working days prior to terminating water and sewer services
to the premises, the General Manager shall post notice outside of the premises, and at each unit if
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
publicly accessible and where practicable, in English, Spanish, or another language that the
Authority reasonably determines may be spoken by occupants at the premises.”.
(b) Subsection 431.2 is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
“431.2 The notice shall be developed in consultation with the Office of the Tenant
Advocate and provide the occupants, whether tenants or owners, with the following
information:”.
(2) Paragraph (a) is amended to read as follows
“(a) That the owner, condominium association, community association, or other
common interest development is delinquent in the payment of water and sewer service charges,
including the current amount owed and the number of days the account is past due;”.
(3) Paragraph (c) is amended by striking the phrase “may permit” and inserting
the phrase “shall permit” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (d) is amended by striking the phrase “receivership;” and inserting
the phrase “receivership, as provided in D.C. Official Code § 34-2304(a)(1);” in its place.
(c) Subsection 431.5 is amended by striking the word “Director” and inserting the phrase
“General Manager” in its place.
Sec. 6. Applicability.
Section 3 shall apply as of April 18, 1996.
Sec. 7. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 8. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4